fst/nom_stems.lexc
! N125 — 4 entries
LEXICON N125_stems
  dīgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:dīgtwei  # ;
  enmigtwei+N+Sg+Nom:enmigtwei  # ;
  jāstun+N+Sg+Nom:jāstun  # ;
  migtwei+N+Sg+Nom:migtwei  # ;

! N126 — 2 entries
LEXICON N126_stems
  wiltun+N+Sg+Nom:wiltun  # ;
  prawiltun+N+Sg+Nom:prawiltun  # ;

! N128 — 1 entries
LEXICON N128_stems
  sēstwei+N+Sg+Nom:sēstwei  # ;

! N131 — 18 entries
LEXICON N131_stems
  āngautwei+N+Sg+Nom:āngautwei  # ;
  attentatwei+N+Sg+Nom:attentatwei  # ;
  auskīpatun+N+Sg+Nom:auskīpatun  # ;
  āudairatun+N+Sg+Nom:āudairatun  # ;
  dēlatwei+N+Sg+Nom:dēlatwei  # ;
  sendraugidēlatwei+N+Sg+Nom:sendraugidēlatwei  # ;
  ebdēlatun+N+Sg+Nom:ebdēlatun  # ;
  ebskīpatun+N+Sg+Nom:ebskīpatun  # ;
  ebwaitjātun+N+Sg+Nom:ebwaitjātun  # ;
  grāmatun+N+Sg+Nom:grāmatun  # ;
  sengrāmatun+N+Sg+Nom:sengrāmatun  # ;
  nōwaitjātwei+N+Sg+Nom:nōwaitjātwei  # ;
  līnkatwei+N+Sg+Nom:līnkatwei  # ;
  nōwaitjātun+N+Sg+Nom:nōwaitjātun  # ;
  pādatun+N+Sg+Nom:pādatun  # ;
  skīpatun+N+Sg+Nom:skīpatun  # ;
  wainikkatun+N+Sg+Nom:wainikkatun  # ;
  ōkupatun+N+Sg+Nom:ōkupatun  # ;

! N133 — 15 entries
LEXICON N133_stems
  dwassilitwei+N+Sg+Nom:dwassilitwei  # ;
  drjāuditun+N+Sg+Nom:drjāuditun  # ;
  enrūditwei+N+Sg+Nom:enrūditwei  # ;
  gīritun+N+Sg+Nom:gīritun  # ;
  kāsitwei+N+Sg+Nom:kāsitwei  # ;
  kāimalukitun+N+Sg+Nom:kāimalukitun  # ;
  lāiditun+N+Sg+Nom:lāiditun  # ;
  šiššelitwei+N+Sg+Nom:šiššelitwei  # ;
  praspīlitun+N+Sg+Nom:praspīlitun  # ;
  spīlitun+N+Sg+Nom:spīlitun  # ;
  wāzelitwei+N+Sg+Nom:wāzelitwei  # ;
  wōimenitwei+N+Sg+Nom:wōimenitwei  # ;
  zāgitun+N+Sg+Nom:zāgitun  # ;
  štīritun+N+Sg+Nom:štīritun  # ;
  štūrmitun+N+Sg+Nom:štūrmitun  # ;

! N135 — 3 entries
LEXICON N135_stems
  etrjaūgitun+N+Sg+Nom:etrjaūgitun  # ;
  rjaūgitwei+N+Sg+Nom:rjaūgitwei  # ;
  palīkitun+N+Sg+Nom:palīkitun  # ;

! N136 — 34 entries
LEXICON N136_stems
  kalbītwei+N+Sg+Nom:kalbītwei  # ;
  dūnītwei+N+Sg+Nom:dūnītwei  # ;
  ebklantītun+N+Sg+Nom:ebklantītun  # ;
  ebtarītun+N+Sg+Nom:ebtarītun  # ;
  etkedītwei+N+Sg+Nom:etkedītwei  # ;
  gurgītwei+N+Sg+Nom:gurgītwei  # ;
  izmigītwei+N+Sg+Nom:izmigītwei  # ;
  migītwei+N+Sg+Nom:migītwei  # ;
  iztarītun+N+Sg+Nom:iztarītun  # ;
  kabītwei+N+Sg+Nom:kabītwei  # ;
  kālsītwei+N+Sg+Nom:kālsītwei  # ;
  kalsītwei+N+Sg+Nom:kalsītwei  # ;
  kedītwei+N+Sg+Nom:kedītwei  # ;
  klantītun+N+Sg+Nom:klantītun  # ;
  perklantītun+N+Sg+Nom:perklantītun  # ;
  perklantītun+N+Sg+Nom:perklantītun  # ;
  klantītwei+N+Sg+Nom:klantītwei  # ;
  lānzītwei+N+Sg+Nom:lānzītwei  # ;
  makītun+N+Sg+Nom:makītun  # ;
  nūnītwei+N+Sg+Nom:nūnītwei  # ;
  paikītun+N+Sg+Nom:paikītun  # ;
  papāikītun+N+Sg+Nom:papāikītun  # ;
  pluškītwei+N+Sg+Nom:pluškītwei  # ;
  praskatītwei+N+Sg+Nom:praskatītwei  # ;
  preikālsītun+N+Sg+Nom:preikālsītun  # ;
  prēitarītwei+N+Sg+Nom:prēitarītwei  # ;
  senkālsītun+N+Sg+Nom:senkālsītun  # ;
  sīndītwei+N+Sg+Nom:sīndītwei  # ;
  skatītwei+N+Sg+Nom:skatītwei  # ;
  skelītun+N+Sg+Nom:skelītun  # ;
  smīrdītwei+N+Sg+Nom:smīrdītwei  # ;
  takītun+N+Sg+Nom:takītun  # ;
  tarītun+N+Sg+Nom:tarītun  # ;
  tarītun+N+Sg+Nom:tarītun  # ;

! N137 — 12 entries
LEXICON N137_stems
  ebplatītwei+N+Sg+Nom:ebplatītwei  # ;
  enplatītwei+N+Sg+Nom:enplatītwei  # ;
  gedītun+N+Sg+Nom:gedītun  # ;
  gedītwei+N+Sg+Nom:gedītwei  # ;
  nurgitwei+N+Sg+Nom:nurgitwei  # ;
  regītwei+N+Sg+Nom:regītwei  # ;
  kīrdītun+N+Sg+Nom:kīrdītun  # ;
  tilītwei+N+Sg+Nom:tilītwei  # ;
  mazītwei+N+Sg+Nom:mazītwei  # ;
  platītwei+N+Sg+Nom:platītwei  # ;
  turītun+N+Sg+Nom:turītun  # ;
  turītun+N+Sg+Nom:turītun  # ;

! N140 — 3 entries
LEXICON N140_stems
  aumadlītun+N+Sg+Nom:aumadlītun  # ;
  madlītun+N+Sg+Nom:madlītun  # ;
  pramadlitun+N+Sg+Nom:pramadlitun  # ;

! N141 — 7 entries
LEXICON N141_stems
  auwaldītun+N+Sg+Nom:auwaldītun  # ;
  enwaldītun+N+Sg+Nom:enwaldītun  # ;
  etgiwītwei+N+Sg+Nom:etgiwītwei  # ;
  gīwītwei+N+Sg+Nom:gīwītwei  # ;
  perwaldītun+N+Sg+Nom:perwaldītun  # ;
  taupītun+N+Sg+Nom:taupītun  # ;
  waldītun+N+Sg+Nom:waldītun  # ;

! N142 — 21 entries
LEXICON N142_stems
  enlaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:enlaikātun  # ;
  erlaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:erlaikātun  # ;
  etlaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:etlaikātun  # ;
  izlaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:izlaikātun  # ;
  laikātun+N+Sg+Nom:laikātun  # ;
  laikātun+N+Sg+Nom:laikātun  # ;
  palaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:palaikātun  # ;
  preilaikātun+N+Sg+Nom:preilaikātun  # ;
  bāndātwei+N+Sg+Nom:bāndātwei  # ;
  izbāndātun+N+Sg+Nom:izbāndātun  # ;
  bijātun+N+Sg+Nom:bijātun  # ;
  perwīdātwei+N+Sg+Nom:perwīdātwei  # ;
  erzinātun+N+Sg+Nom:erzinātun  # ;
  marātwei+N+Sg+Nom:marātwei  # ;
  pazinātun+N+Sg+Nom:pazinātun  # ;
  perbāndātun+N+Sg+Nom:perbāndātun  # ;
  prawīdātun+N+Sg+Nom:prawīdātun  # ;
  preiwīdātun+N+Sg+Nom:preiwīdātun  # ;
  tālkātun+N+Sg+Nom:tālkātun  # ;
  wīdātun+N+Sg+Nom:wīdātun  # ;
  zinātun+N+Sg+Nom:zinātun  # ;

! N144 — 35 entries
LEXICON N144_stems
  bangaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:bangaūtwei  # ;
  auklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:auklaūtun  # ;
  aulaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:aulaūtwei  # ;
  aušaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:aušaūtun  # ;
  enklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:enklaūtun  # ;
  enrikaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:enrikaūtwei  # ;
  entataūtun+N+Sg+Nom:entataūtun  # ;
  erkarjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:erkarjaūtun  # ;
  eršaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:eršaūtun  # ;
  etklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:etklaūtun  # ;
  gilaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:gilaūtwei  # ;
  grekaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:grekaūtwei  # ;
  izklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izklaūtun  # ;
  izšaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izšaūtun  # ;
  kainaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:kainaūtun  # ;
  karjaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:karjaūtwei  # ;
  karwaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:karwaūtwei  # ;
  kaupaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:kaupaūtwei  # ;
  klaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:klaūtun  # ;
  perklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:perklaūtun  # ;
  preiklaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:preiklaūtun  # ;
  meldjaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:meldjaūtwei  # ;
  mjāutwei+N+Sg+Nom:mjāutwei  # ;
  rikaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:rikaūtun  # ;
  neikaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:neikaūtwei  # ;
  pastaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:pastaūtwei  # ;
  pintegaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:pintegaūtwei  # ;
  pusideinaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:pusideinaūtwei  # ;
  rikaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:rikaūtwei  # ;
  spaktaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:spaktaūtwei  # ;
  spellautun+N+Sg+Nom:spellautun  # ;
  spjaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:spjaūtwei  # ;
  supnaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:supnaūtun  # ;
  waikaūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:waikaūtwei  # ;
  šaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:šaūtun  # ;

! N76s — 4 entries
LEXICON N76s_stems
  auklekstun+N+Sg+Nom:auklekstun  # ;
  irtwei+N+Sg+Nom:irtwei  # ;
  krīkstwei+N+Sg+Nom:krīkstwei  # ;
  snākstwei+N+Sg+Nom:snākstwei  # ;

! N80b — 10 entries
LEXICON N80b_stems
  kartun+N+Sg+Nom:kartun  # ;
  ebglabtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebglabtun  # ;
  engabtun+N+Sg+Nom:engabtun  # ;
  gabtun+N+Sg+Nom:gabtun  # ;
  pagabtun+N+Sg+Nom:pagabtun  # ;
  pergabtun+N+Sg+Nom:pergabtun  # ;
  glabtun+N+Sg+Nom:glabtun  # ;
  preiglabtun+N+Sg+Nom:preiglabtun  # ;
  kwaktwei+N+Sg+Nom:kwaktwei  # ;
  skabtun+N+Sg+Nom:skabtun  # ;

! N134a — 24 entries
LEXICON N134a_stems
  aubilītwei+N+Sg+Nom:aubilītwei  # ;
  bilītun+N+Sg+Nom:bilītun  # ;
  bilītun+N+Sg+Nom:bilītun  # ;
  bilītun+N+Sg+Nom:bilītun  # ;
  erbilītun+N+Sg+Nom:erbilītun  # ;
  izbilītun+N+Sg+Nom:izbilītun  # ;
  pabilītun+N+Sg+Nom:pabilītun  # ;
  perbilītun+N+Sg+Nom:perbilītun  # ;
  prabilītun+N+Sg+Nom:prabilītun  # ;
  preibilītun+N+Sg+Nom:preibilītun  # ;
  ebstalītwei+N+Sg+Nom:ebstalītwei  # ;
  ebwaidilītun+N+Sg+Nom:ebwaidilītun  # ;
  emprīkibilītwei+N+Sg+Nom:emprīkibilītwei  # ;
  emprīkistalītwei+N+Sg+Nom:emprīkistalītwei  # ;
  etbilītwei+N+Sg+Nom:etbilītwei  # ;
  izstalītun+N+Sg+Nom:izstalītun  # ;
  lailītwei+N+Sg+Nom:lailītwei  # ;
  pelītwei+N+Sg+Nom:pelītwei  # ;
  perstalītwei+N+Sg+Nom:perstalītwei  # ;
  preistalītwei+N+Sg+Nom:preistalītwei  # ;
  stalītwei+N+Sg+Nom:stalītwei  # ;
  medjātun+N+Sg+Nom:medjātun  # ;
  talītun+N+Sg+Nom:talītun  # ;
  waidilītwei+N+Sg+Nom:waidilītwei  # ;
